California statutes. Penal Code
(3) For an order to pay a fine, make payments to a domestic violence shelter-based program, or pay restitution as a condition of probation under this subdivision or
 subdivision (c), the court shall make a determination of the defendant’s ability to pay. An order to make payments to a domestic violence shelter-based program, shall not be made if it would impair the ability of the defendant to pay direct restitution to the victim or court-ordered child support.

(4) If the injury to a married person is caused, in whole or in part, by the criminal acts of the person’s spouse in violation of subdivision (c), the community property shall not be used to discharge the liability of the offending spouse for restitution to the injured spouse required by Section 1203.04, as operative on or before August 2, 1995, or Section 1202.4, or to a shelter for costs with regard to the injured spouse and dependents required by this subdivision, until all separate property of the offending spouse is exhausted.

(5) A person violating an order described in subdivision (c) may be punished for any substantive offenses described under Section 136.1 or 646.9. A finding of contempt shall not be a bar to prosecution for a violation of Section 136.1 or 646.9. However, a person held in contempt for a violation of subdivision (c) shall be entitled to credit for any punishment imposed as a result of that violation against a sentence imposed upon conviction of an offense described in Section 136.1 or 646.9. A conviction or acquittal for a substantive offense under Section 136.1 or 646.9 shall be a bar to a subsequent punishment for contempt arising out of the same act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 704, Sec. 1.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

166.5.

(a) After arrest and before plea or trial or after conviction or plea of guilty and before sentence under paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 166, for willful disobedience of any order for child, spousal, or family support issued pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 3500) of the Family Code or Section 17400 of the Family Code, the court may suspend proceedings or sentence therein if:

(1) The defendant appears before the court and affirms his or her obligation to
 pay to the person having custody of the child, or the spouse, that sum per month as shall have been previously fixed by the court in order to provide for the minor child or the spouse.

(2) The defendant provides a bond or other undertaking with sufficient sureties to the people of the State of California in a sum as the court may fix to secure the defendant’s performance of his or her support obligations and that bond or undertaking is valid and binding for two years, or any lesser time that the court shall fix.

(b) Upon the failure of the defendant to comply with the conditions imposed by the court in subdivision (a), the defendant may be ordered to appear before the court and show cause why further proceedings should not be had in the action or why sentence should not be imposed, whereupon the court may proceed with the action, or pass sentence, or for good cause shown may
 modify the order and take a new bond or undertaking and further suspend proceedings or sentence for a like period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 653, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

167.

Every person who, by any means whatsoever, willfully and knowingly, and without knowledge and consent of the jury, records, or attempts to record, all or part of the proceedings of any trial jury while it is deliberating or voting, or listens to or observes, or attempts to listen to or observe, the proceedings of any trial jury of which he is not a member while such jury is deliberating or voting is guilty of a misdemeanor.

This section is not intended to prohibit the taking of notes by a trial juror in connection with and solely for the purpose of assisting him in the performance of his
 duties as such juror.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

168.

(a) Every district attorney, clerk, judge, or peace officer who, except by issuing or in executing a search warrant or warrant of arrest for a felony, willfully discloses the fact of the warrant prior to execution for the purpose of preventing the search or seizure of property or the arrest of any person shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(b) This section shall not prohibit the following:

(1) A disclosure made by a district attorney or the Attorney General for the sole purpose of securing voluntary compliance with the warrant.

(2) Upon the return of an indictment and the issuance of an arrest warrant, a disclosure of the existence of the indictment and arrest warrant by a district attorney or the Attorney General to assist in the apprehension of a defendant.

(3) The disclosure of an arrest warrant pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14207.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 437, Sec. 7.   (SB 1066)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

169.

Any person who pickets or parades in or near a building which houses a court of this state with the intent to interfere with, obstruct, or impede the administration of justice or with the intent to influence any judge, juror, witness, or officer of the court in the discharge of his duty is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1444.)
-------------------------------------------

170.

Every person who maliciously and without probable cause procures a search warrant or warrant of arrest to be issued and executed, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

171.

Every person, not authorized by law, who, without the permission of the officer in charge of any reformatory in this State, communicates with any person detained therein, or brings therein or takes therefrom any letter, writing, literature, or reading matter to or from any person confined therein, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

171b.

(a) Any person who brings or possesses within any state or local public building or at any meeting required to be open to the public pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of, or Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of, the Government Code, any of the following is guilty of a public offense punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or in the state prison:

(1) Any firearm.

(2) Any deadly weapon described in Section 17235 or in any provision listed in Section 16590.

(3) Any knife with a blade length in excess of four inches, the blade of which is fixed or is capable of being fixed in an unguarded position by the use of one or two hands.

(4) Any unauthorized tear gas weapon.

(5) Any taser or stun gun as defined in Section 244.5.

(6) Any instrument that expels a metallic projectile, such as a BB or pellet, through the force of air pressure, CO2 pressure, or spring action, or any spot marker gun or paint gun.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to, or affect, any of the following:

(1) A person
 who possesses weapons in, or transports weapons into, a court of law to be used as evidence.

(2) (A) A duly appointed peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, a retired peace officer with authorization to carry concealed weapons as described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6, a full-time paid peace officer of another state or the federal government who is carrying out official duties while in California, or any person summoned by any of these officers to assist in making arrests or preserving the peace while they are actually engaged in assisting the officer.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), subdivision (a) shall apply to any person who brings or
 possesses any weapon specified therein within any courtroom if they are a party to an action pending before the court.

(3) A person holding a valid license to carry the firearm pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 26150) of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6 who possesses the firearm within a building designated for a court proceeding, including matters before a superior court, district court of appeal, or the California Supreme Court, and is a justice, judge, or commissioner of the court.

(4) A person who has permission to possess that weapon granted in writing by a duly authorized official who is in charge of the security of the state or local government building.

(5) A person who lawfully resides in, lawfully
 owns, or is in lawful possession of, that building with respect to those portions of the building that are not owned or leased by the state or local government.

(6) A person licensed or registered in accordance with, and acting within the course and scope of, Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 7512) or Chapter 11.6 (commencing with Section 7590) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code who has been hired by the owner or manager of the building if the person has permission pursuant to paragraph (5).

(7) (A) A person who, for the purpose of sale or trade, brings any weapon that may otherwise be lawfully transferred, into a gun show conducted pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 27200) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 27300) of
 Chapter 3 of Division 6 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(B) A person who, for purposes of an authorized public exhibition, brings any weapon that may otherwise be lawfully possessed, into a gun show conducted pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 27200) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 27300) of Chapter 3 of Division 6 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(c) As used in this section, “state or local public building” means a building that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) It is a building or part of a building owned or leased by the state or local government, if state or local public employees are regularly present for the purposes of performing their official duties. A state or local public building includes, but is
 not limited to, a building that contains a courtroom.

(2) It is not a building or facility, or a part thereof, that is referred to in Section 171c, 171d, 626.9, 626.95, or 626.10 of this code, or in Section 18544 of the Elections Code.

(3) It is a building not regularly used, and not intended to be used, by state or local employees as a place of residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 249, Sec. 2.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

171c.

(a) (1) Any person who brings a loaded firearm into, or possesses a loaded firearm within, the State Capitol, the state office building at 1021 O Street in the City of Sacramento, any legislative office, any office of the Governor or other constitutional officer, or any hearing room in which any committee of the Senate or Assembly is conducting a hearing, or upon the grounds of the State Capitol, which is bounded by 10th, L, 15th, and N Streets in the City of Sacramento, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than one year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both such imprisonment and fine, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of
 Section 1170.

(2) Any person who brings or possesses, within the State Capitol, any legislative office, any hearing room in which any committee of the Senate or Assembly is conducting a hearing, the Legislative Office Building at 1020 N Street in the City of Sacramento, the state office building at 1021 O Street in the City of Sacramento, or upon the grounds of the State Capitol, which is bounded by 10th, L, 15th, and N Streets in the City of Sacramento, any of the following, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period not to exceed one year, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, if the area is posted with a statement providing reasonable notice that prosecution may result from possession of any of these items:

(A) Any firearm.

(B) Any deadly weapon described in Section 21510 or in any provision listed in Section 16590.

(C) Any knife with a blade length in excess of four inches, the blade of which is fixed or is capable of being fixed in an unguarded position by the use of one or two hands.

(D) Any unauthorized tear gas weapon.

(E) Any stun gun, as defined in Section 244.5.

(F) Any instrument that expels a metallic projectile, such as a BB or pellet, through the force of air pressure, CO2 pressure, or spring action, or any spot marker gun or paint gun.

(G) Any
 ammunition as defined in Sections 16150 and 16650.

(H) Any explosive as defined in Section 12000 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to, or affect, any of the following:

(1) A duly appointed peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, a retired peace officer with authorization to carry concealed weapons as described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6, a full-time paid peace officer of another state or the federal government who is carrying out official duties while in California, or any person summoned by any of these officers to assist in making arrests or preserving the peace while
 that person is actually engaged in assisting the officer.

(2) A person holding a valid license to carry the firearm pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 26150) of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6, and who has permission granted by the Chief Sergeants at Arms of the State Assembly and the State Senate to possess a concealed weapon upon the premises described in subdivision (a).

(3) A person who has permission granted by the Chief Sergeants at Arms of the State Assembly and the State Senate to possess a weapon upon the premises described in subdivision (a).

(c) (1) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6 of
 this code, Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or any other law with a penalty greater than is set forth in this section.

(2) The provisions of this section are cumulative, and shall not be construed as restricting the application of any other law. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by different provisions of law shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 253, Sec. 1.   (AB 173)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

171d.

Any person, except a duly appointed peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, a full-time paid peace officer of another state or the federal government who is carrying out official duties while in California, any person summoned by that officer to assist in making arrests or preserving the peace while they are actually engaged in assisting the officer, a member of the military forces of this state or of the United States engaged in the performance of their duties, the Governor or a member of their immediate family or a person acting with their permission with respect to the Governor’s Mansion or any other residence of the Governor, any other constitutional officer or a member of their immediate family or a person
 acting with their permission with respect to the officer’s residence, or a Member of the Legislature or a member of their immediate family or a person acting with their permission with respect to the Member’s residence, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, if they do either of the following:

(a) Bring a firearm into, or possess a firearm within, the Governor’s Mansion, or any other residence of the Governor, the residence of any other constitutional officer, or the residence of any Member of the Legislature.

(b) Bring a firearm upon, or possess a firearm upon, the grounds of the
 Governor’s Mansion or any other residence of the Governor, the residence of any other constitutional officer, or the residence of any Member of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 249, Sec. 3.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

171e.

A firearm shall be deemed loaded for the purposes of Sections 171c and 171d whenever both the firearm and unexpended ammunition capable of being discharged from such firearm are in the immediate possession of the same person.

In order to determine whether or not a firearm is loaded for the purpose of enforcing Section 171c or 171d, peace officers are authorized to examine any firearm carried by anyone on his person or in a vehicle while in any place or on the grounds of any place in or on which the possession of a loaded firearm is prohibited by Section 171c or 171d. Refusal to allow a peace
 officer to inspect a firearm pursuant to the provisions of this section constitutes probable cause for arrest for violation of Section 171c or 171d.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 960.)
-------------------------------------------

171f.

No person or group of persons shall willfully and knowingly:

1. Enter or remain within or upon any part of the chamber of either house of the Legislature unless authorized, pursuant to rules adopted or permission granted by either such house, to enter or remain within or upon a part of the chamber of either such house;

2. Engage in any conduct within the State Capitol which disrupts the orderly conduct of official business.

A violation of this section is a
 misdemeanor.

As used in this section, “State Capitol” means the building which is intended primarily for use of the legislative department and situated in the area bounded by 10th, L, 15th, and N Streets in the City of Sacramento.

Nothing in this section shall forbid any act of any Member of the Legislature, or any employee of a Member of the Legislature, any officer or employee of the Legislature or any committee or subcommittee thereof, or any officer or employee of either house of the Legislature or any committee or subcommittee thereof, which is performed in the lawful discharge of his official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

171.5.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Airport” means an airport, with a secured area, that regularly serves an air carrier holding a certificate issued by the United States Secretary of Transportation.

(2) “Passenger vessel terminal” means only that portion of a harbor or port facility, as described in Section 105.105(a)(2) of Title 33 of the Code of Federal Regulations, with a secured area that regularly serves scheduled commuter or passenger operations.

(3) “Sterile area” means a portion of an airport defined in the airport security program to which access generally
 is controlled through the screening of persons and property, as specified in Section 1540.5 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or a portion of any passenger vessel terminal to which, pursuant to the requirements set forth in Sections 105.255 and 105.260(a) of Title 33 of the Code of Federal Regulations, access is generally controlled in a manner consistent with the passenger vessel terminal’s security plan and the maritime security level in effect at the time.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly possess any firearm in any building, real property, or parking area under the control of an airport, except as provided for in subdivision (b), (c), or (e) of Section 26230.

(c) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly possess, within any sterile area of
 an airport or a passenger vessel terminal, any of the following items:

(1) Any knife with a blade length in excess of four inches, the blade of which is fixed, or is capable of being fixed, in an unguarded position by the use of one or two hands.

(2) Any box cutter or straight razor.

(3) Any metal military practice hand grenade.

(4) Any metal replica hand grenade.

(5) Any plastic replica hand grenade.

(6) Any imitation firearm as defined in Section 417.4.

(7) Any frame, receiver,
 barrel, or magazine of a firearm.

(8) Any unauthorized tear gas weapon.

(9) Any taser or stun gun as defined in Section 244.5.

(10) Any instrument that expels a metallic projectile, such as a BB or pellet, through the force of air pressure, CO2 pressure, or spring action, or any spot marker gun or paint gun.

(11) Any ammunition as defined in Section 16150.

(d) Subdivisions (b) and (c) shall not apply to, or affect, any of the following:

(1) A duly appointed peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3
 of Part 2, a retired peace officer with authorization to carry concealed weapons as described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6, a full-time paid peace officer of another state or the federal government who is carrying out official duties while in California, or any person summoned by any of these officers to assist in making arrests or preserving the peace while they are actually engaged in assisting the officer.

(2) A person who has authorization to possess a weapon specified in subdivision (c), granted in writing by an airport security coordinator who is designated as specified in Section 1542.3 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and who is responsible for the security of the airport.

(3) A person,
 including an employee of a licensed contract guard service, who has authorization to possess a weapon specified in subdivision (c) granted in writing by a person discharging the duties of Facility Security Officer or Company Security Officer pursuant to an approved United States Coast Guard facility security plan, and who is responsible for the security of the passenger vessel terminal.

(e) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to, or affect, any person possessing an unloaded firearm being transported in accordance with Sections 1540.111(c)(2)(iii) and 1540.111(c)(2)(iv) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, which require a hard-sided, locked container, so long as the person is not within any sterile area of an airport or a passenger vessel terminal.

(f) A violation of this
 section is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(g) The provisions of this section are cumulative, and shall not be construed as restricting the application of any other law. However, an act or omission that is punishable in different ways by this and any other provision of law shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(h) Nothing in this section is intended to affect existing state or federal law regarding the transportation of firearms on airplanes in checked luggage or the possession of the items listed in subdivision (c) in areas that are not “sterile areas.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 249, Sec. 4.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

171.7.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Public transit facility” means any land, building, or equipment, or an interest therein, including a station on a public transportation route, to which access is controlled in a manner consistent with the public transit authority’s security plan, whether or not the operation thereof produces revenue, that has as its primary purpose the operation of a public transit system or the providing of services to the passengers of a public transit system. A public transit system includes the vehicles used in the system, including, but not limited to, motor vehicles, streetcars, trackless trolleys, buses, light rail systems, rapid transit systems, subways, trains,
 or jitneys, that transport members of the public for hire.

(2) “Firearm” has the same meaning as specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16520.

(b) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly possess any of the following in a public transit facility:

(1) A firearm.

(2) An imitation firearm as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 16700.

(3) An instrument that expels a metallic projectile, such as a BB or pellet, through the force of air pressure, CO2 pressure, or spring action, or a spot marker gun or paint gun.

(4) A
 metal military practice hand grenade.

(5) A metal replica hand grenade.

(6) A plastic replica hand grenade.

(7) An unauthorized tear gas weapon.

(8) An undetectable knife, as described in Section 17290.

(9) An undetectable firearm, as described in Section 17280.

(c) (1) Subdivision (b) does not apply to, or affect, any of the following:

(A) A duly appointed peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2.

(B) A retired peace officer with authorization to carry concealed weapons as described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(C) A full-time paid peace officer of another state or the federal government who is carrying out official duties while in California.

(D) A qualified law enforcement officer of another state or the federal government, as permitted under the Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act pursuant to Section 926B or 926C of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(E) A person summoned by an officer listed in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, to assist in making arrests or preserving the peace while they
 are actually engaged in assisting the officer.

(F) A person who is responsible for the security of the public transit system and who has been authorized by the public transit authority’s security coordinator, in writing, to possess a weapon specified in subdivision (b).

(G) A person possessing an unloaded firearm while traveling on a public transit system that offers checked baggage services, so long as the firearm is stored in accordance with the public transit system’s checked baggage policies.

(2) Paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) does not apply to or affect the possession of a tear gas weapon when possession is permitted pursuant to Division 11 (commencing with Section 22810) of Title 3 of Part 6.

(3) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) does not apply to a person transporting an unloaded firearm locked in a lock box in compliance with paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 26230.

(d) A violation of this section is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(e) The provisions of this section are cumulative and do not restrict the application of any other law. However, an act or omission that is punishable in different ways by this and any other provision of law shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(f) This section does not prevent prosecution under any other provision of law that may provide a greater punishment.

(g) This section shall be interpreted so as to be consistent with Section 926A of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 1.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

172.

(a) Every person who, within one-half mile of the land belonging to this state upon which any state prison, or within 1,900 feet of the land belonging to this state upon which any Youth Authority institution is situated, or within one mile of the grounds belonging to the University of California, at Berkeley, or within one mile of the grounds belonging to the University of California at Santa Barbara, as such grounds existed as of January 1, 1961, or within one mile of the grounds belonging to Fresno State College, as such grounds existed as of January 1, 1959, or within three miles of the University Farm at Davis, or within 112
 miles of any building actually occupied as a home, retreat, or asylum for ex-soldiers, sailors, and marines of the Army and Navy of the United States, established or to be established by this state, or by the United States within this state, or within the State Capitol, or within the limits of the grounds adjacent and belonging thereto, sells or exposes for sale, any alcoholic beverage, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), or by imprisonment for not less than 50 days or by both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court.

(b) The provision of subdivision (a) of this section prohibiting the sale or exposure for sale of any alcoholic beverage within 1,900 feet of the land belonging to this state upon which any Youth Authority
 institution is situated shall not apply with respect to the Fred C. Nelles School for Boys.

(c) Except within the State Capitol or the limits of the grounds adjacent and belonging thereto, as mentioned in subdivision (a) of this section, the provisions of this section shall not apply to the sale or exposing or offering for sale of ale, porter, wine, similar fermented malt or vinous liquor or fruit juice containing one-half of 1 percent or more of alcohol by volume and not more than 3.2 percent of alcohol by weight nor the sale or exposing or offering for sale of beer.

(d) Distances provided in this section shall be measured not by airline but by following the shortest highway or highways as defined in Section 360 of the Vehicle Code connecting the points in question. In
 measuring distances from the Folsom State Prison and the eastern facilities of the California Institution for Men at Chino and Youth Training School, the measurement shall start at the entrance gate.

(e) The provision of subdivision (a) prohibiting the sale or exposure for sale of any alcoholic beverage within 112 miles of any building actually occupied as a home, retreat, or asylum for ex-soldiers, sailors, and marines of the Army and Navy of the United States shall not apply to the Veterans’ Home at Yountville, Napa County, California.

(f) The prohibition in subdivision (a) on the sale or exposure for sale of any alcoholic beverage within the State Capitol or within the limits of the grounds
 adjacent and belonging thereto does not apply with respect to an event that is held on those grounds if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The event is organized and operated by a nonprofit organization that is located in the City of Sacramento for purposes of increasing awareness of the Sacramento region and promoting education about the food and wine of the Sacramento region.

(2) Tickets for the event are sold on a presale basis only and are not available for sale at the event.

(3) Each attendee has purchased a ticket for the event, regardless of whether the attendee consumes any food or alcohol at the event.

(4) Alcohol is not sold at the event,
 and any orders or any other activities that would constitute exposure for sale of alcoholic beverages do not occur at the event, except as authorized by this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 224, Sec. 1.   (AB 400)   Effective September 11, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

172a.

Every person who, within one and one-half miles of the university grounds or campus, upon which are located the principal administrative offices of any university having an enrollment of more than 1,000 students, more than 500 of whom reside or lodge upon such university grounds or campus, sells or exposes for sale, any intoxicating liquor, is guilty of a misdemeanor; provided, however, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to nor prohibit the sale of any of said liquors by any regularly licensed pharmacist who shall maintain a fixed place of business in said territory, upon the written prescription of a physician
 regularly licensed to practice medicine under the laws of the State of California when such prescription is dated by the physician issuing it, contains the name of the person for whom the prescription is written, and is filled for such person only and within 48 hours of its date; provided further, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to nor prohibit the sale of any of said liquors for chemical or mechanical purposes; provided further, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to nor prohibit the sale or exposing or offering for sale of ale, porter, wine, similar fermented malt, or vinous liquor or fruit juice containing one-half of 1 percent or more of alcohol by volume and not more than 3.2 percent of alcohol by weight nor the sale or exposing or offering for sale of beer.

In measuring distances from the university grounds or campus of any such university, such distances shall not be measured by airline but by following the shortest road or
 roads connecting the points in question. With respect to Leland Stanford Junior University measurements from the university grounds or campus shall be by airline measurement.

Any license issued and in effect in the City and County of San Francisco on the effective date of the amendment of this section enacted at the 1961 Regular Session of the Legislature may be transferred to any location in the City and County of San Francisco.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1588.)
-------------------------------------------

172b.

1. Every person who, within one and one-half miles of the boundaries of the grounds belonging to the University of California at Los Angeles on which the principal administrative offices of the university are located, as such boundaries were established as of July 1, 1959, sells or exposes for sale any intoxicating liquor, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), or by imprisonment for not less than 50 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court.

2. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the sale or exposing or offering for sale of ale, porter, wine, similar fermented malt or vinous liquor or fruit juice containing one-half of 1 percent or more of alcohol by volume and not more than 3.2 percent of alcohol by weight nor the sale or exposing or offering for sale of beer.

3. Distances provided in this section shall be measured not by airline but by following the shortest road or roads connecting the points in question.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1588.)
-------------------------------------------

172c.

Section 172a shall not apply to the sale at auction of alcoholic beverages by a nonprofit organization at the California Science Center premises located at Exposition Park, Los Angeles, California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 841, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

172d.

1. Every person who, within one mile of that portion of the grounds at Riverside (hereinafter described) belonging to the University of California, that will be used by the College of Letters and Sciences, sells, or exposes for sale, any intoxicating liquor, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), or by imprisonment for not less than 50 days or by both such fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court.

2. The provisions of this section shall not apply
 to the sale or exposing or offering for sale of ale, porter, wine, similar fermented malt or vinous liquor or fruit juice containing one-half of 1 percent or more of alcohol by volume and not more than 3.2 percent of alcohol by weight nor the sale or exposing or offering for sale of beer.

3. Distances provided in this section shall be measured not by air line but by following the shortest vehicular road or roads connecting the points in question.

4. The portion of the grounds of the University of California referred to in paragraph 1 are situated in the County of Riverside and more particularly described as follows: beginning at the intersection of Canyon Crest Drive and U.S. Highway 60, thence southeasterly along said highway to a point opposite the intersection of said U.S. Highway 60 and Pennsylvania Avenue, thence northeasterly following centerline of present drive into
 University campus, thence continuing north along said centerline of drive on west side of Citrus Experiment Station buildings to a point intersecting the present east-west road running east from intersection of Canyon Crest Drive and U.S. Highway 60, thence east 500 feet more or less, thence north 1,300 feet more or less, thence east to intersection of east boundary of the Regents of the University of California property (Valencia Hill Drive), thence north along said east boundary to the north boundary of the Regents of the University of California property (Linden Street), thence west along said north boundary to the west boundary of the Regents of the University of California property (Canyon Crest Drive) thence south along said west boundary to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1241.)
-------------------------------------------

172e.

The provisions of Sections 172, 172a, 172b, 172d, and 172g of this code shall not apply to the sale or the exposing or offering for sale of alcoholic beverages by an on-sale licensee under the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act within premises licensed as a bona fide public eating place as provided in the Constitution and as defined in the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act (commencing at Section 23000, Business and Professions Code), or within premises licensed as a club as defined in Articles 4 and 5 of Chapter 3 of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act, provided that such club shall have been in existence for not less than 5 years, have a
 membership of 300 or more, and serves meals daily to its members, or by the holder of a caterer’s permit under the provisions of Section 23399 of the Business and Professions Code in connection with the serving of bona fide meals as defined in Section 23038 of the Business and Professions Code, and the provisions of such sections shall not be construed so as to preclude the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control from issuing licenses for bona fide public eating places within the areas prescribed by the sections. The provisions of this section shall not permit the issuance of licenses to fraternities, sororities, or other student organizations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 599.)
-------------------------------------------

172f.

The provisions of Sections 172, 172a, 172b, 172d, and 172g of this code shall not apply to the sale or the exposing or offering for sale of any intoxicating liquor in any premises within the areas prescribed by said sections for which a license was issued under the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act (Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000), Business and Professions Code) and is in effect on the effective date of this section or on the effective date of any amendment to Section 172g specifying an additional institution, or in any licensed premises which may become included in such a prescribed area because of the extension of the